en: Chinese green teas, Chinese green tea
de: Chinesische grüne Tees, chinesische Grüntees
es: Tés verdes chinos
fi: Kiinalaiset vihreät teet, Kiinalainen vihreä tee
fr: Thés verts chinois, Thé vert chinois
hr: Kineski zeleni čajevi
hu: Kínai zöld teák
lt: Kiniška žalioji arbata
nl: Chinese groene theeën, Chinese groene thee
zh: 中国绿茶

en: Maojian teas, Mao Jian teas
es: Tés Maojian, Tés Mao Jian
fr: Mao Jian
hr: Maojian čajevi
nl: Mao Feng
zh: 毛尖

en: Long Jing green teas, Dragon Well
es: Tés Long Jing, Tés Longjing
fr: Thés verts Long Jing, puits du dragon
hr: Dugi jing zeleni čajevi
nl: Longjingtheeën, Longjingthee
zh: 龙井, 龙井绿茶

en: Japanese green teas, Green teas from Japan, Japanese green tea
de: Japanische grüne Tees, japanische Grüntees
es: Tés verdes japoneses
fi: Japanilaiset vihreät teet, Vihreät teet Japanista, Japanilainen vihreä tee
fr: Thés verts japonais, Thés verts du Japon, Thé vert du Japon
hr: Japanski zeleni čajevi
hu: Japán zöld teák
it: Tè vedi giapponesi
nl: Japanse groene theeën, Japanse groene thee
zh: 日本绿茶

en: Bancha teas, Bancha
de: Benchatees
es: Tés Bancha, Bancha
fr: Thés bancha, bancha
hr: Bancha čajevi
nl: Bancha, Banchatheeën, Banchathee
zh: 番茶

en: Genmaicha teas, Genmaicha, Brown Rice Tea
de: Genmaichatees
es: Tés Genmaicha, Genmaicha
fr: Thés Genmaicha
hr: Genmaicha čajevi
nl: Genmaicha, Genmaicha theeën, Genmaicha thee

en: Sencha teas, Sencha, Broiled tea
de: Senchatees
es: Tés Sencha, Sencha
fr: Thés Sencha, Sencha
hr: Sencha čajevi
hu: Sencha teák
it: Tè Sencha
ja: 煎茶
nl: Sencha, Sencha theeën, Sencha thee
zh: 煎茶

en: Fukuju teas, Fukuju
de: Fukujutees
es: Tés Fukuju, Fukuju
fr: Thés Fukuju, Fukuju
hr: Fukuju čajevi
nl: Fukuju, Fukujutheeën, Fukujuthee

en: Roasted Green teas
de: Geröstete grüne Tees, Geröstete Grüntees
fr: Thés verts torréfiés, Thé vert torréifié
hr: Prženi zeleni čajevi
nl: Geroosterde groene theeën, Geroosterde groene thee

en: Lemon teas
de: Zitronentees
es: Tés con limón, Té sabor limón
fi: sitruunateet
fr: Thés au citron, Thé au citron
hr: Čajevi od limuna
ja: レモンティ, レモンティー
lt: Citrinų arbata
nl: Theeën met citroen, Thee met citroen, Citroentheeën, Citroenthee
ru: Чаи с лимоном
zh: 柠檬茶

en: Vanilla teas
de: Vanilletees
es: Tés de vainilla
fr: Thés à la vanille
hr: Čajevi od vanilije
ja: バニラティ, バニラティー
lt: Vanilinės arbatos
nl: Vanilletheeën, Vanillethee
zh: 香草茶

en: Mint teas
de: Minztees, Pfefferminztees
es: Tés con hierbabuena, Tés a la menta
fi: minttuteet
fr: Thés à la menthe, Thé à la menthe
hr: Čajevi od mente
hu: Menta teák
it: Tè alla menta
ja: ミントティ, ミントティー
lt: Mėtinės arbatos
nl: Munttheeën, Muntthee
zh: 薄荷茶

en: Green teas with mint
de: Grüner Tees mit Minze, Grüntees mit Minze
es: Tés verdes con menta
fi: Vihreät teet mintulla
fr: Thés verts à la menthe
hr: Zeleni čajevi s mentom
hu: Zöld teák mentával, Mentás zöld teák
it: Tè verde alla menta
lt: Žalioji arbata su mėta
nl: Groene theeën met munt, Groene thee met munt

en: Oolong teas, Oolong
de: Oolongtees
es: Tés oolong, Tés azules
fr: Thés bleus, Thé bleu, Thés Oolong
hr: Oolong čajevi
hu: Oolong teák
ja: 烏龍茶, ウーロン茶
nl: Oolong theeën, Oolong, Oolong thee

en: Brewed oolong tea without sugar
fr: Thé oolong infusé non sucré

en: White teas, baicha
de: Weiße Tees
es: Tés blancos
fi: valkoiset teet
fr: Thés blancs, báichá, thé blanc
hr: Bijeli čajevi
hu: Fehér teák
it: Tè bianco
ja: 白茶
nl: Witte theeën, Witte thee
zh: 白茶

en: Baihao Yinzhen teas, Baihao Yinzhen, Bai Hao Yinzhen teas, Bai Hao Yinzhen, White Hair Silver Needle
es: Tés Baihao Yinzhen, Tés Bai Hao Yinzhen
fr: Bai Hao Yin Zhen, Yin Zhen
hr: Baihao yinzhen čajevi
nl: Bai Hao Yin Zhen
zh: 白毫银针

en: Bai Mudan teas, Bai Mudan
es: Tés Bai Mudan
fr: Bai Mu Dan, Pai Mu Tan
hr: Bai mudan čajevi
nl: Bai Mudan theeën, Bai Mudan thee
zh: 白牡丹茶

en: Shoumei teas
de: Shoumeitees
es: Tés Shoumei, Tés Shou Mei
fr: Shou Mei
hr: Shoumei čajevi
nl: Shou Mei theeën, SHou Mei thee
zh: 寿眉茶

en: Rock teas
de: Wuyi-Tee, Felsentee, Rock Tea
es: Tés de roca, Té de roca
fr: Jasonia glutineux
hr: Kameni čajevi
la: Chiliadenus saxatilis, Jasonia glutinosa
nl: Rock theeën, Rock thee